Utah statutes.
31A-21-202.   Explicit approval required.
(1)  The following clauses are disapproved unless the commissioner gives them
explicit approval:
(a)  clauses requiring more expeditious notice of loss or proof of loss than
is required by Section 31A-21-312 or rules adopted under that section; and
(b)  a schedule of reinstatement fees under Section 31A-22-608, if made a part
of the policy.  This type of schedule need not be included in the policy but
may be given approval as a separate document specifically made applicable to
particular classes of policies and incorporated in the policy by reference.
(2)  If an insurer fails to obtain explicit approval from the commissioner for
the clauses specified in Subsection (1), the clauses are void.
